src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* Noun 08 kask examples:*
* *kask* `kask+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *kaskat* `kask+N+Sg+Par:`
* *kaskahe* `kask+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *kaskast* `kask+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *kaskalõ* `kask+N+Sg+All:`
* *kaskal* `kask+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *kaskalt* `kask+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *kaskas* `kask+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *kaskaniq* `kask+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *kaskaldaq* `kask+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *kaskagaq* `kask+N+Sg+Com:`
* *kaskaq* `kask+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *kaskit* `kask+N+Pl+Par:`
* *kaskihe* `kask+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *kaskist* `kask+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *kaskilõ* `kask+N+Pl+All:`
* *kaskil* `kask+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *kaskilt* `kask+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *kaskis* `kask+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *kaskiniq* `kask+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *kaskildaq* `kask+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *kaskidõgaq* `kask+N+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-kask**

Secondary

kuldnõ:kuld

* Adjective 08 kuldnõ examples:*
* *kuldnõ* `kuldnõ+A+Sg+Nom:`
* *kuldsõt* `kuldnõ+A+Sg+Par:`
* *kuldsõhe* `kuldnõ+A+Sg+Ill:`
* *kuldsõl* `kuldnõ+A+Sg+Ade:`
* *kuldsõlt* `kuldnõ+A+Sg+Abl:`
* *kuldsõs* `kuldnõ+A+Sg+Tra:`
* *kuldsõniq* `kuldnõ+A+Sg+Ter:`
* *kuldsõldaq* `kuldnõ+A+Sg+Abe:`
* *kuldsõgaq* `kuldnõ+A+Sg+Com:`
* *kuldsõq* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Nom:`
* *kuldsit* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Par:`
* *kuldsihe* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Ill:`
* *kuldsist* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Ela:`
* *kuldsilõ* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+All:`
* *kuldsil* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Ade:`
* *kuldsilt* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Abl:`
* *kuldsis* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Tra:`
* *kuldsiniq* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Ter:`
* *kuldsildaq* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Abe:`
* *kuldsidõgaq* `kuldnõ+A+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-kuldnw**

Secondary

* LEXICON NMN_8KOLMAS/VIIES  kolmas:kolma

* Noun 08 kolmas examples:*
* *kolmas* `kolmas+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *kolmandat* `kolmas+N+Sg+Par:`
* *kolmandahe* `kolmas+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *kolmandast* `kolmas+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *kolmandalõ* `kolmas+N+Sg+All:`
* *kolmandal* `kolmas+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *kolmandalt* `kolmas+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *kolmandas* `kolmas+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *kolmandaniq* `kolmas+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *kolmandaldaq* `kolmas+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *kolmandagaq* `kolmas+N+Sg+Com:`
* *kolmandaq* `kolmas+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *kolmansidõ* `kolmas+N+Pl+Gen:`
* *kolmansit* `kolmas+N+Pl+Par:`
* *kolmansihe* `kolmas+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *kolmansist* `kolmas+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *kolmansilõ* `kolmas+N+Pl+All:`
* *kolmansil* `kolmas+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *kolmansilt* `kolmas+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *kolmansis* `kolmas+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *kolmansiniq* `kolmas+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *kolmansildaq* `kolmas+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *kolmansidõgaq* `kolmas+N+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-kuldnw**

* Noun 08 sadang examples:*
* *sadang* `sadang+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *sadangut* `sadang+N+Sg+Par:`
* *sadanguhe* `sadang+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *sadangust* `sadang+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *sadangulõ* `sadang+N+Sg+All:`
* *sadangul* `sadang+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *sadangult* `sadang+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *sadangus* `sadang+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *sadanguniq* `sadang+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *sadanguldaq* `sadang+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *sadangugaq* `sadang+N+Sg+Com:`
* *sadanguq* `sadang+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *sadangit* `sadang+N+Pl+Par:`
* *sadangihe* `sadang+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *sadangist* `sadang+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *sadangilõ* `sadang+N+Pl+All:`
* *sadangil* `sadang+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *sadangilt* `sadang+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *sadangis* `sadang+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *sadanginiq* `sadang+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *sadangildaq* `sadang+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *sadangidõgaq* `sadang+N+Pl+Com:`

Secondary

* Noun 08 tuhat examples:*
* *tuhat* `tuhat+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *tuhandõt* `tuhat+N+Sg+Par:`
* *tuhandõhe* `tuhat+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *tuhandõst* `tuhat+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *tuhandõlõ* `tuhat+N+Sg+All:`
* *tuhandõl* `tuhat+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *tuhandõlt* `tuhat+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *tuhandõs* `tuhat+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *tuhandõniq* `tuhat+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *tuhandõldaq* `tuhat+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *tuhandõgaq* `tuhat+N+Sg+Com:`
* *tuhandõq* `tuhat+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *tuhandidõ* `tuhat+N+Pl+Gen:`
* *tuhandit* `tuhat+N+Pl+Par:`
* *tuhandihe* `tuhat+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *tuhandist* `tuhat+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *tuhandilõ* `tuhat+N+Pl+All:`
* *tuhandil* `tuhat+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *tuhandilt* `tuhat+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *tuhandis* `tuhat+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *tuhandiniq* `tuhat+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *tuhandildaq* `tuhat+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *tuhandidõgaq* `tuhat+N+Pl+Com:`

* Noun 08 dollaŕ examples:*
* *dollaŕ* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *dollarit* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Par:`
* *dollarihe* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *dollarist* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *dollarilõ* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+All:`
* *dollaril* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *dollarilt* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *dollaris* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *dollariniq* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *dollarildaq* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *dollarigaq* `dollaŕ+N+Sg+Com:`
* *dollariq* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *dollaridõ* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Gen:`
* *dollarit* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Par:`
* *dollarihe* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *dollarist* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *dollarilõ* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+All:`
* *dollaril* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *dollarilt* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *dollaris* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *dollariniq* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *dollarildaq* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *dollaridõgaq* `dollaŕ+N+Pl+Com:`

Secondary

* Noun 10 aastak  examples:*
* *aastak:* `aastak+N+Sg+Nom`
* *aastaga:* `aastak+N+Sg+Gen`
* *aastakat:* `aastak+N+Sg+Par`
* *aastakahe:* `aastak+N+Sg+Ill`
* *aastakan:* `aastak+N+Sg+Ine`
* *aastakast:* `aastak+N+Sg+Ela`
* *aastakalõ:* `aastak+N+Sg+All`
* *aastakal:* `aastak+N+Sg+Ade`
* *aastakalt:* `aastak+N+Sg+Abl`
* *aastakas:* `aastak+N+Sg+Tra`
* *aastakaniq:* `aastak+N+Sg+Ter`
* *aastakaldaq:* `aastak+N+Sg+Abe`
* *aastagagaq:* `aastak+N+Sg+Com`
* *aastagaq:* `aastak+N+Pl+Nom`
* *aastakidõ:* `aastak+N+Pl+Gen`
* *aastakit:* `aastak+N+Pl+Par`
* *aastakihe:* `aastak+N+Pl+Ill`
* *aastakin:* `aastak+N+Pl+Ine`
* *aastakist:* `aastak+N+Pl+Ela`
* *aastakilõ:* `aastak+N+Pl+All`
* *aastakil:* `aastak+N+Pl+Ade`
* *aastakilt:* `aastak+N+Pl+Abl`
* *aastakis:* `aastak+N+Pl+Tra`
* *aastakiniq:* `aastak+N+Pl+Ter`
* *aastakildaq:* `aastak+N+Pl+Abe`
* *aastakidõgaq:* `aastak+N+Pl+Com`
**N-hwrak10**

* **LEXICON NMN_36RAMM/SILM ** silm:silm

* Noun 36 silmä ämm examples:*
* *ämm* `ämm+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *ämmä* `ämm+N+Sg+Par:`
* *ämmä* `ämm+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *ämmäst* `ämm+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *ämmäle* `ämm+N+Sg+All:`
* *ämmäl* `ämm+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *ämmält* `ämm+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *ämmäs* `ämm+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *ämmäniq* `ämm+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *ämmäldäq* `ämm+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *ämmägaq* `ämm+N+Sg+Com:`
* *ämmäq* `ämm+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *ämmi* `ämm+N+Pl+Par:`
* *ämmihe* `ämm+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *ämmist* `ämm+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *ämmile* `ämm+N+Pl+All:`
* *ämmil* `ämm+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *ämmilt* `ämm+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *ämmis* `ämm+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *ämminiq* `ämm+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *ämmildäq* `ämm+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *ämmigaq* `ämm+N+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-silm36**
gradation No, vowelHarmony Front

Secondary

Secondary

* **LEXICON NMN_36NJUKR/LAEHK ** lähk:läh%{kØ%}

* Noun 36 lähk examples:*
* *lähk* `lähk+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *lähkä* `lähk+N+Sg+Par:`
* *lähkä* `lähk+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *lähäst* `lähk+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *lähäle* `lähk+N+Sg+All:`
* *lähäl* `lähk+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *lähält* `lähk+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *lähäs* `lähk+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *lähäniq* `lähk+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *lähäldäq* `lähk+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *lähägaq* `lähk+N+Sg+Com:`
* *lähäq* `lähk+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *lähki* `lähk+N+Pl+Par:`
* *lähkihe* `lähk+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *lähist* `lähk+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *lähile* `lähk+N+Pl+All:`
* *lähil* `lähk+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *lähilt* `lähk+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *lähis* `lähk+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *lähiniq* `lähk+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *lähildäq* `lähk+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *lähkigaq* `lähk+N+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-lähk36**
gradation Yes, vowelHarmony Front

Secondary

Secondary

LEXICON NMN_9KIPWN1/ELLAEI  kipõń:kipõń fixme 2016-08-27
* Yaml: **N-kipwnj**
LEXICON NMN_9KIPWN1/VETEL1  kipõń:ki%{pb%}õ%{nń%}

* Noun 09 kipõń examples:*
* *kipõń* `kipõń+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *kibõnat* `kipõń+N+Sg+Par:`
* *kibõnahe* `kipõń+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *kibõnast* `kipõń+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *kibõnalõ* `kipõń+N+Sg+All:`
* *kibõnal* `kipõń+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *kibõnalt* `kipõń+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *kibõnas* `kipõń+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *kibõnaniq* `kipõń+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *kibõnaldaq* `kipõń+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *kibõnagaq* `kipõń+N+Sg+Com:`
* *kibõnaq* `kipõń+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *kibõnit* `kipõń+N+Pl+Par:`
* *kibõnihe* `kipõń+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *kibõnist* `kipõń+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *kibõnilõ* `kipõń+N+Pl+All:`
* *kibõnil* `kipõń+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *kibõnilt* `kipõń+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *kibõnis* `kipõń+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *kibõniniq* `kipõń+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *kibõnildaq* `kipõń+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *kibõnidõgaq* `kipõń+N+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-kipwnj**

LEXICON NMN_9ALLWV1/XX  allõv́:ki%{pb%}õ%{nń%}

* Noun 09 allõv́ examples:*
* *allõv́* `allõv́+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *alõvit* `allõv́+N+Sg+Par:`
* *alõvihe* `allõv́+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *alõvist* `allõv́+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *alõvilõ* `allõv́+N+Sg+All:`
* *alõvil* `allõv́+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *alõvilt* `allõv́+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *alõvis* `allõv́+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *alõviniq* `allõv́+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *alõvildaq* `allõv́+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *alõvigaq* `allõv́+N+Sg+Com:`
* *alõviq* `allõv́+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *alõvõt* `allõv́+N+Pl+Par:`
* *alõvõhe* `allõv́+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *alõvõst* `allõv́+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *alõvõlõ* `allõv́+N+Pl+All:`
* *alõvõl* `allõv́+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *alõvõlt* `allõv́+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *alõvõs* `allõv́+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *alõvõniq* `allõv́+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *alõvõldaq* `allõv́+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *alõvõdõgaq* `allõv́+N+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-kipwnj**

LEXICON NMN_9ALLAS1/SINNEL1  allaś:allas
* Yaml: **N-kipwnj**

LEXICON NMN_9TUKWV/VERREV  tukõv:tu%{kg%}õv

* Adjective 09 tukõv examples:*
* *tukõv* `tukõv+A+Sg+Nom:`
* *tugõvat* `tukõv+A+Sg+Par:`
* *tugõvahe* `tukõv+A+Sg+Ill:`
* *tugõvast* `tukõv+A+Sg+Ela:`
* *tugõvale* `tukõv+A+Sg+All:`
* *tugõval* `tukõv+A+Sg+Ade:`
* *tugõvalt* `tukõv+A+Sg+Abl:`
* *tugõvas* `tukõv+A+Sg+Tra:`
* *tugõvaniq* `tukõv+A+Sg+Ter:`
* *tugõvaldaq* `tukõv+A+Sg+Abe:`
* *tugõvagaq* `tukõv+A+Sg+Com:`
* *tugõjaq* `tukõv+A+Pl+Nom:`
* *tugõjit* `tukõv+A+Pl+Par:`
* *tugõjihõ* `tukõv+A+Pl+Ill:`
* *tugõjist* `tukõv+A+Pl+Ela:`
* *tugõjilõ* `tukõv+A+Pl+All:`
* *tugõjil* `tukõv+A+Pl+Ade:`
* *tugõjilt* `tukõv+A+Pl+Abl:`
* *tugõjis* `tukõv+A+Pl+Tra:`
* *tugõjiniq* `tukõv+A+Pl+Ter:`
* *tugõjildaq* `tukõv+A+Pl+Abe:`
* *tugõjidegaq* `tukõv+A+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-tukwv**

LEXICON NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI  elläi:e%{lØ%}lä%{ij%}

* Noun 09 elläi examples:*
* *elläi* `elläi+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *eläjät* `elläi+N+Sg+Par:`
* *eläjähe* `elläi+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *eläjäst* `elläi+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *eläjäle* `elläi+N+Sg+All:`
* *eläjäl* `elläi+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *eläjält* `elläi+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *eläjäs* `elläi+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *eläjäniq* `elläi+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *eläjäldäq* `elläi+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *eläjägaq* `elläi+N+Sg+Com:`
* *eläjäq* `elläi+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *eläjit* `elläi+N+Pl+Par:`
* *eläjihe* `elläi+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *eläjist* `elläi+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *eläjile* `elläi+N+Pl+All:`
* *eläjil* `elläi+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *eläjilt* `elläi+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *eläjis* `elläi+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *eläjiniq* `elläi+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *eläjildäq* `elläi+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *eläjidegaq* `elläi+N+Pl+Com:`

* Yaml: **N-ellaei9**

SHOULD THIS BE HERE, c.f. yaml

LEXICON NMN_9TAHHE/HERRE  tahhe:ta%{hØ%}he

* Noun 09 tahhe examples:*
* *tahhe* `tahhe+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *tahehet* `tahhe+N+Sg+Par:`
* *tahehehe* `tahhe+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *tahehest* `tahhe+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *tahehelõ* `tahhe+N+Sg+All:`
* *tahehel* `tahhe+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *tahehelt* `tahhe+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *tahehes* `tahhe+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *taheheniq* `tahhe+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *taheheldaq* `tahhe+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *tahehegaq* `tahhe+N+Sg+Com:`
* *taheheq* `tahhe+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *tahehidõ* `tahhe+N+Pl+Gen:`
* *tahehit* `tahhe+N+Pl+Par:`
* *tahehihe* `tahhe+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *tahehist* `tahhe+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *tahehilõ* `tahhe+N+Pl+All:`
* *tahehil* `tahhe+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *tahehilt* `tahhe+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *tahehis* `tahhe+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *tahehiniq* `tahhe+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *tahehildaq* `tahhe+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *tahehidõgaq* `tahhe+N+Pl+Com:`
* Yaml: **N-kipwnj**

LEXICON NMN_9VILLW/XX  villõ:vi%{lØ%}lõ

* Noun 09 villõ examples:*
* *villõ* `villõ+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *vilõhõt* `villõ+N+Sg+Par:`
* *vilõhõhe* `villõ+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *vilõhõst* `villõ+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *vilõhõlõ* `villõ+N+Sg+All:`
* *vilõhõl* `villõ+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *vilõhõlt* `villõ+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *vilõhõs* `villõ+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *vilõhõniq* `villõ+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *vilõhõldaq* `villõ+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *vilõhõgaq* `villõ+N+Sg+Com:`
* *vilõhõq* `villõ+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *vilõhidõ* `villõ+N+Pl+Gen:`
* *vilõhit* `villõ+N+Pl+Par:`
* *vilõhihe* `villõ+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *vilõhist* `villõ+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *vilõhilõ* `villõ+N+Pl+All:`
* *vilõhil* `villõ+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *vilõhilt* `villõ+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *vilõhis* `villõ+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *vilõhiniq* `villõ+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *vilõhildaq* `villõ+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *vilõhidõgaq* `villõ+N+Pl+Com:`
* Yaml: **N-kipwnj**

* @OCDE@ hõrak:hõrak
